Utah, session 2026, HB488.
Section 1. Section 53E-4-202 is amended to read:53E-4-202Effective 07/01/26Partially Repealed 01/01/28. Core standards for Utah public schools -- Notice and hearing requirements.(1)(a)In establishing minimum standards related to curriculum and instruction requirements under Section 53E-3-501, the state board shall, in consultation with local school boards, school superintendents, teachers, employers, and parents implement core standards for Utah public schools that will enable students to, among other objectives:(i)communicate effectively, both verbally and through written communication;(ii)apply mathematics; and(iii)access, analyze, and apply information.; and(iv)understand history and government as described in Sections 53E-4-208 and 53G-10-302.(b)Except as provided in this public education code, the state board may recommend but may not require a local school board or charter school governing board to use:(i)a particular curriculum or instructional material; or(ii)a model curriculum or instructional material.(2)The state board shall, in establishing the core standards for Utah public schools:(a)identify the basic knowledge, skills, and competencies each student is expected to acquire or master as the student advances through the public education system; and(b)align with each other the core standards for Utah public schools and the assessments described in Section 53E-4-303.(3)The basic knowledge, skills, and competencies identified pursuant toin accordance with Subsection (2)(a) shall increase in depth and complexity from year to year and focus on consistent and continual progress within and between grade levels and courses in the basic academic areas of:(a)English, including explicit phonics, spelling, grammar, reading, writing, vocabulary, speech, and listening; and(b)mathematics, including basic computational skills.; and(c)social studies, including history and government as described in Sections 53E-4-208 and 53G-10-302.(4)Before adopting core standards for Utah public schools, the state board shall:(a)publicize draft core standards for Utah public schools for the state, as a class A notice under Section 63G-30-102, for at least 90 days;(b)invite public comment on the draft core standards for Utah public schools for a period of not less than 90 days; and(c)conduct three public hearings that are held in different regions of the state on the draft core standards for Utah public schools.(5)LEA governing boards shall design their school programs, that are supported by generally accepted scientific standards of evidence, to focus on the core standards for Utah public schools with the expectation that each program will enhance or help achieve mastery of the core standards for Utah public schools.(6)Except as provided in Sections 53G-10-103 and 53G-10-402, each school may select instructional materials and methods of teaching, that are supported by generally accepted scientific standards of evidence, that the school considers most appropriate to meet the core standards for Utah public schools.(7)The state may exit any agreement, contract, memorandum of understanding, or consortium that cedes control of the core standards for Utah public schools to any other entity, including a federal agency or consortium, for any reason, including:(a)the cost of developing or implementing the core standards for Utah public schools;(b)the proposed core standards for Utah public schools are inconsistent with community values; or(c)the agreement, contract, memorandum of understanding, or consortium:(i)was entered into in violation of Chapter 3, Part 8, Implementing Federal or National Education Programs, or Title 63J, Chapter 5, Federal Funds Procedures Act;(ii)conflicts with Utah law;(iii)requires Utah student data to be included in a national or multi-state database;(iv)requires records of teacher performance to be included in a national or multi-state database; or(v)imposes curriculum, assessment, or data tracking requirements on home school or private school students.(8)The state board shall:(a)submit a report in accordance with Section 53E-1-203 on the development and implementation of the core standards for Utah public schools, including the time line established for the review of the core standards for Utah public schools; and(b)ensure that the report described in Subsection (8)(a) includes the time line established for the review of the core standards for Utah public schools by a standards review committee and the recommendations of a standards review committee established under Section 53E-4-203.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53E-4-208 is enacted to read:53E-4-208Effective 07/01/26. High-quality open educational resource instructional materials for social studies and civics education.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Open education resource instructional material" means teaching, learning, and research resources that are in the public domain or have been released under an intellectual property license that allows for free use, reuse, modification, and sharing with others, including full courses, course materials, modules, textbooks, streaming videos, tests, software, and any other tools, materials, or techniques used to support access to knowledge.(b)"Utah core standards" means the standards described in Section 53E-4-202.(2)Notwithstanding any other provision in this part, and subject to legislative appropriation, the state board shall:(a)develop comprehensive open educational resource instructional materials for social studies and civics education for students in kindergarten through grade 12 that:(i)align with Utah core standards for social studies, including the requirements of Section 53G-10-302;(ii)meet the instructional needs of students in kindergarten through grade 12 in a manner suitable for the age and developmental level of students at each grade level;(iii)provide accessibility to students with disabilities in compliance with federal and state law; and(iv)are available in digital and, where appropriate, print formats;(b)ensure the open educational resource instructional materials include:(i)comprehensive instructional materials aligned with social studies core standards;(ii)teacher resources, including:(A)scopes and sequences;(B)topics by grade level;(C)text selection guides;(D)unit and lesson-level implementation guides;(E)daily lesson plans;(F)formative, interim, and summative assessments; and(G)professional development materials;(iii)student materials and resources, including:(A)student-facing instructional materials;(B)guided practice materials;(C)independent practice materials;(D)digital learning resources;(E)project and performance tasks;(F)other classroom supports; and(G)implementation guides to support LEAs in the adoption and use of the materials;(c)establish quality standards and review processes for materials developed under this section;(d)ensure that:(i)the state owns all intellectual property rights, including copyright, in the open educational resource instructional materials developed under this section; and(ii)the open educational resource instructional materials are openly licensed under a Creative Commons license or equivalent license to allow an LEA to use, adapt, customize, and distribute the materials without charge; and(e)make the open educational resource instructional materials available through a centralized digital platform accessible to all LEAs and the public.(3)In developing open educational resource instructional materials under this section, the state board shall:(a)consult with LEAs, teachers, curriculum specialists, and other education stakeholders;(b)establish timelines for phased development and implementation;(c)provide opportunities for pilot programs and field testing before statewide release;(d)ensure ongoing review and updates to maintain alignment with Utah core standards and educational best practices;(e)ensure open education resource instructional materials are available to all students, parents, classroom teachers, and LEAs in this state free of charge, except for a fee for the printing or shipping of the material; and(f)review and update the open educational resource instructional materials whenever the state board updates or revises social studies core standards to ensure continued alignment with the revised standards and the requirements of Section 53G-10-302.(4)The state board may not require an LEA to adopt or use the open educational resource instructional materials developed under this section.(5)The state board may:(a)make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to:(i)establish standards and procedures for contracting under this section;(ii)establish quality standards and suitability rubrics for open educational resource instructional materials developed under this section;(iii)establish procedures for LEA access to and use of the open educational resource instructional materials; and(iv)establish procedures for ongoing review, updates, and maintenance of the open educational resource instructional materials;(b)upon request, report to the Education Interim Committee regarding:(i)progress on curriculum development under this section, including timelines and milestones;(ii)expenditures from appropriations under this section;(iii)LEA adoption and use of the open educational resource instructional materials;(iv)feedback from LEAs, teachers, and other stakeholders, including parents; and(v)plans and progress for updates, maintenance, and expansion of the open educational resource instructional materials.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 53E-4-303 is amended to read:53E-4-303Effective 07/01/26. Utah standards assessments -- Administration -- Review committee.(1)As used in this section,: (a)"computer"Computer adaptive assessment" means an assessment that measures the range of a student's ability by adapting to the student's responses, selecting more difficult or less difficult questions based on the student's responses.(b)"Founding document" means a document foundational to the United States or Utah, including:(i)the Declaration of Independence;(ii)the United States Constitution;(iii)the Federalist Papers;(iv)the Utah Constitution; and(v)other significant historical documents that shaped American or Utah constitutional history and civic thought.(2)The state board shall:(a)adopt a standards assessment that:(i)measures a student's proficiency in:(A)mathematics for students in each of grades 3 through 8 until July 1, 2026, and 3 through 10 after July 1, 2026;(B)English language arts for students in each of grades 3 through 8 until July 1, 2026, and 3 through 10 after July 1, 2026;(C)science for students in each of grades 4 through 8 until July 1, 2026, and 4 through 10 after July 1, 2026; and(D)writing for students in at least grades 5 and 8; and(ii)except for the writing measurement described in Subsection (2)(a)(i)(D), is a computer adaptive assessment; and(b)ensure that an assessment described in Subsection (2)(a) is:(i)a criterion referenced assessment;(ii)administered online;(iii)aligned with the core standards for Utah public schools; and(iv)adaptable to personalized, competency-based learning, as that term is defined in Section 53F-5-501.; and(c)beginning in the 2028-2029 school year, ensure that the English language arts assessment described in Subsection (2)(a)(i)(B) integrates passages and questions drawn from founding documents and historical texts by:(i)embedding within the English language arts assessment reading passages, excerpts, and questions drawn from:(A)founding documents as defined in Subsection (1)(b);(B)historical speeches and writings referenced in Section 53G-10-302; and(C)other primary historical sources;(ii)ensuring that the passages and questions described in Subsection (2)(c)(i) are age-appropriate and aligned with grade-level English language arts standards; and(iii)ensuring that the passages and questions described in Subsection (2)(c)(i) assess English language arts skills, including reading comprehension, analysis, and interpretation of complex texts.(3)A school district or charter school shall annually administer the standards assessment adopted by the state board under Subsection (2) to all students in the subjects and grade levels described in Subsection (2).(4)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (4)(b), a student's score on the standards assessment adopted under Subsection (2) may not be considered in determining:(i)the student's academic grade for a course; or(ii)whether the student may advance to the next grade level.(b)A teacher may use a student's score on the standards assessment adopted under Subsection (2) to improve the student's academic grade for or demonstrate the student's competency within a relevant course.(5)(a)The state board shall establish a committee consisting of 15 parents of Utah public education students to review all standards assessment questions.(b)The committee established in Subsection (5)(a) shall include the following parent members:(i)five members appointed by the chair of the state board;(ii)five members appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives or the speaker's designee; and(iii)five members appointed by the president of the Senate or the president's designee.(c)The state board shall provide staff support to the parent committee.(d)The term of office of each member appointed in Subsection (5)(b) is four years.(e)The chair of the state board, the speaker of the House of Representatives, and the president of the Senate shall adjust the length of terms to stagger the terms of committee members so that approximately half of the committee members are appointed every two years.(f)No member may receive compensation or benefits for the member's service on the committee.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 53G-10-302 is amended to read:53G-10-302Effective 07/01/26. Instruction in American history and government -- Study and posting of American heritage documents -- Comparative instruction on government systems.(1)As used in this section,: (a)"American Exceptionalism" means the unique characteristics and achievements of the United States, including:(i)the nation's founding principles of individual liberty, limited government, and natural rights;(ii)the enduring strength and adaptability of the United States Constitution;(iii)the protection of individual freedoms and religious liberty;(iv)economic prosperity through free market capitalism and entrepreneurship;(v)the promotion of human rights and representative self-government globally; and(vi)the contributions of American innovation, culture, and civil society to human progress and flourishing.(b)"Communist government or ideology" means a system of government, governance, or political theory that has historically resulted in widespread human rights abuses, economic failure, and totalitarian oppression, characterized by:(i)collective or state ownership of property and the means of production;(ii)centralized economic planning;(iii)single-party authoritarian rule; or(iv)suppression of individual rights and liberties in favor of collective goals.(c)"Ten Commandments" means the Decalogue, known as the Ten Commandments, as recorded in the Hebrew Scriptures in Exodus 20:2-17 and Deuteronomy 5:6-21.(2)The Legislature recognizesfinds that a proper understanding of American history and government is essential to good citizenship, and that the public schools are the primary public institutions charged with responsibility for assisting children and youth in gaining that understanding.:(a)under Article III of the Utah Constitution, the Legislature has an irrevocable obligation to make laws for the establishment and maintenance of a system of public schools open to all children of the state;(b)the Utah Constitution's Preamble declares the purpose "to secure and perpetuate the principles of free government";(c)fulfilling these constitutional duties requires that a student receive effective instruction in American history and government; and(d)such instruction is essential to good citizenship, and the public schools are the primary public institutions charged with responsibility for assisting children and youth in gaining that understanding.(3)(a)The state board and local school boards shall periodically review school curricula and activities to ensure that effective instruction in American history and government is taking place in the public schools.(b)The boards shall solicit public input as part of the review process.(c)Instruction in American history and government shall include a study of:(i)forms of government, such as a republic, a pure democracy, a monarchy, and an oligarchy;(ii)political philosophies and economic systems, such as socialism, individualism, and free market capitalism; and(iii)the United States' form of government, a compound constitutional republic.;(iv)the roles and responsibilities of government officials, including:(A)statewide elected officials;(B)county officials;(C)mayors and city council members;(D)school board members; and(E)other local governmental officials;(v)the voting process and election laws of this state, including the caucus and convention system;(vi)the purpose and benefits of the Electoral College system in presidential elections, including:(A)how the system protects state sovereignty;(B)ensures broad geographic representation; and(C)maintains the federal nature of the republic;(vii)the eligibility requirements to run for elected office at the federal, state, and local levels;(viii)parliamentary procedure, including the basic principles of Robert's Rules of Order;(ix)the elected officials who represent students at each level of government;(x)American Exceptionalism and the unique contributions of the United States to human liberty and prosperity; and(xi)comparative instruction on government systems as described in Subsections (8) and (9).(4)School curricula and activities shall include a thorough study of historical documents and principles such as:(a)the Declaration of Independence;(b)the United States Constitution;(c)the national motto;(d)the pledge of allegiance;(e)the national anthem;(f)the Mayflower Compact;(g)the writings, speeches, documents, and proclamations of the Founders and the Presidents of the United States;, including:(i)the entirety of George Washington's Farewell Address;(ii)speeches of Abraham Lincoln;(iii)Frederick Douglass's speeches, including "The Meaning of July Fourth for the Negro" and "What the Black Man Wants";(iv)the Seneca Falls Declaration;(v)Martin Luther King Jr.'s speech, "I Have a Dream"; and(vi)the Letter from Birmingham Jail;(h)organic documents from the pre-Colonial, Colonial, Revolutionary, Federalist, and post Federalist eras;, including:(i)the Articles of Confederation;(ii)the Iroquois Constitution;(iii)selected passages from the Federalist and Antifederalist Papers, including Federalist Papers Numbers 10 and 51; and(iv)excerpts from the Lincoln-Douglas Debates;(i)United States Supreme Court decisions;(j)the Ten Commandments;(k)the Magna Carta;(l)Acts of the United States Congress, including the published text of the Congressional Record; and(m)United States treaties.;(n)excerpts from Alexis de Tocqueville's Democracy in America;(o)the Bible, including the Hebrew Scriptures and New Testament, as literary and historical texts that have influenced American constitutional history, civic thought, and cultural development;(p)in accordance with Subsection (11), when teaching Utah history, an LEA may include study of religious beliefs and texts that influenced Utah's early settlers, presented in an objective, academic manner that examines historical impact; and(q)the Utah Constitution and other founding documents and influential writings that shaped American constitutional history and civic thought.(5)To increase student understanding of, and familiarity with, American historical documents, public schools may display historically important excerpts from, or copies of, those documents in school classrooms and common areas as appropriate.(6)There shall be no content-based censorship of American history and heritage documents referred to in this section due to their religious or cultural nature.(7)Public schools shall display "In God we trust," which is declared in 36 U.S.C. 302 to be the national motto of the United States, in one or more prominent places within each school building.(8)Beginning in the 2028-2029 school year, the state board shall ensure that social studies core standards for students in grade 4 through grade 12 include instruction that compares and contrasts the principles and outcomes of the United States constitutional republic with those of pure democracies, communist governments and ideologies, and other autocratic government systems.(9)The state board shall ensure that the core standards for instruction comparing government systems include instruction on:(a)American Exceptionalism and the founding principles of the United States constitutional republic, including:(i)individual liberty and natural rights;(ii)limited government and separation of powers;(iii)federalism;(iv)the rule of law;(v)free market economics and private property rights;(vi)representative democracy and civic participation; and(vii)why the Founders rejected pure democracy, including ancient Greek examples;(b)the fundamental characteristics of communist governments and ideologies, including:(i)collective ownership and centralized economic control;(ii)single-party authoritarian rule;(iii)suppression of individual rights and political dissent;(iv)state control of information and media; and(v)centralized economic planning;(c)the history and tactics of communist movements in the United States, including:(i)the spread of communist ideology during the 20th century;(ii)efforts to infiltrate American institutions; and(iii)the response of the United States government and civil society to communist movements;(d)historical crimes, human rights violations, and economic failures caused by communist regimes, including:(i)the Cultural Revolution in China;(ii)the Holodomor in Ukraine;(iii)the Great Terror in the Soviet Union;(iv)the Cambodian genocide under the Khmer Rouge;(v)the human rights violations and economic failures of the Cuban communist regime;(vi)the violence and destabilization caused by communist guerrilla movements in Latin America; and(vii)the systematic persecution of religious groups and suppression of religious practice under communist regimes; and(e)comparative outcomes demonstrating the benefits of constitutional republicanism through comparison with communist, pure democratic, and other autocratic systems, including:(i)economic prosperity and innovation;(ii)protection of human rights and individual freedoms;(iii)political stability and peaceful transfer of power;(iv)quality of life and opportunity for citizens; and(v)contributions to global peace and prosperity.(10)In accordance with Subsection (11), instruction in American history and government shall include study of the historical and philosophical context in which the founding documents were created, including:(a)analysis of religious and philosophical references contained in founding documents, including:(i)the reference in the Declaration of Independence to "Nature's God," "Creator," "Supreme Judge of the world," and "divine Providence";(ii)religious and philosophical influences on concepts of natural rights and limited government as reflected in primary source documents from the founding era;(iii)the debates over religious liberty and the relationship between religion and government as reflected in founding era documents, including writings on the First Amendment; and(iv)the study of the Bible as a foundational literary text where narratives, moral teachings, and language have shaped American culture, law, and political discourse, including:(A)specific biblical passages cited or alluded to in founding documents;(B)biblical narratives and concepts that shaped colonial American political thought;(C)the use of biblical language and imagery in political rhetoric of the founding era and throughout American history;(D)biblical influences on concepts of covenant, law, justice, and liberty in American constitutional thought; and(E)how different religious traditions interpreted and applied biblical texts to questions of government and civic duty;(b)comparative analysis of different philosophical traditions that influenced American founding thought, including classical republicanism, Enlightenment philosophy, Protestant and Catholic thought, deism, natural law theory, and other intellectual traditions; and(c)the development of American principles of religious liberty, including:(i)the First Amendment's protections for religious exercise and prohibitions on religious establishment;(ii)state constitutional provisions on religious liberty; and(iii)how these principles have been interpreted and applied throughout American history.(11)An LEA shall ensure instruction provided under Subsections (4)(p) and (10):(a)is presented in an objective, academic manner appropriate to the study of history, government, and literature;(b)neither promotes nor disparages any particular religious or nonreligious viewpoint;(c)focuses on religious texts' literary forms, historical context, and documented influence on American civic thought and Utah's settlement history rather than on theological or doctrinal questions;(d)may use multiple translations of religious texts for comparative literary and historical analysis;(e) acknowledges diverse interpretations of religious texts and their application to political thought and settlement history; and(f)for instruction under Subsection (10), is integrated with the study of founding documents and principles.(12)The state board shall ensure that each review and revision of social studies core standards includes the requirements of this section, including instruction on American Exceptionalism, comparative government systems, founding documents, and the historical and literary context of American civic thought.(13)An LEA shall implement curriculum and instructional materials that align with the social studies core standards established under this section and may utilize the open educational resource instructional materials developed under Section 53E-4-208.(14)Nothing in this section prohibits an LEA from exceeding the minimum standards established by the state board under this section.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 53G-10-307 is amended to read:53G-10-307Effective 07/01/26. Art or fine arts education -- Definition -- Credit requirements.(1)As used in this section,  "art" or "fine arts" means:(a)courses, instruction, or experiences in visual arts, music, dance, or theater;(b)courses, instruction, or experiences in applied crafts and technical arts that incorporate artistic elements, including:(i)woodworking;(ii)metalworking and welding;(iii)traditional handcrafts;(iv)architectural trades, including carpentry, plumbing, masonry, and stonework;(v)automotive design and customization;(vi)digital design and animation; or(vii)other similar courses that combine technical skill with artistic expression; and(c)other forms of creative or interpretive expression as an LEA determines.(2)For purposes of meeting art or fine arts credit requirements the state board establishes, thean LEA shall accept for an art or fine arts credit any determine whether a course listed in Subsection (1) that meets art or fine arts credit requirements and shall accept the course for an art or fine arts credit if the LEA determines the course:(a)incorporates artistic or creative elements in the curriculum;(b)includes instruction in principles of design, form, or aesthetic expression; and(c)provides students opportunities for creative expression and artistic application of technical skills.(3)Nothing in this section:(a)prevents an LEA from:(i)establishing the LEA's own additional criteria for artistic and creative elements in courses accepted for fine arts creditcourses accepted for fine arts credit; or(ii)offering additional courses for fine arts credit; or(b)requires an LEA to offer all courses listed in Subsection (1).

Section 6:
Section 6.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on July 1, 2026.